Louisiana, session 2026, HB127.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9097.38(B) and (F)(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§9097.38. Victoria Farms Crime Prevention and Improvement District
* * *
B. Boundaries. The boundaries of the district are coterminous with the
boundaries of the Victoria Farms Subdivision as established in the official
subdivision plat filed with the clerk of court for East Baton Rouge Parish shall
include the area within the following perimeter: Airline Highway, Greenwell Street,
Joor Road, and Greenwell Springs Road.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 127 ENROLLED
F. Parcel fee. The district may impose and collect a parcel fee within the
district subject to and in accordance with the provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
(4) The fee shall be imposed only after its imposition has been approved by
a majority of the registered voters of the district voting on the proposition at an
election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. The
amount of the fee may be changed by duly adopted resolution of the board, not to
exceed the maximum amount authorized in this Subsection.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.